Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2. Control Board Generally.

§ 62.1-44.7.
Board continued.

The State Water Control Board established in the Executive Department of the Commonwealth, is continued.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-19; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

Cross references.

As to the creation of the Department of Environmental Quality and the consolidation of the State Water Control Board into that department, see § 10.1-1183.

§ 62.1-44.8.
Number, appointment and terms of members.

The Board shall consist of seven members appointed by the Governor subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. Members shall be appointed for the terms of four years each. Vacancies other than by expiration of a term shall be filled by the Governor by appointment for the unexpired term.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-20; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 2008, cc. 276, 557.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and deleted “appointed before July 1, 1970, shall continue in office for the terms for which appointed. Effective July 1, 1970, two members shall be appointed for a term of one year, and two members shall be appointed for a term of four years. Thereafter the successors of all members” following “Members” in the second sentence.

§ 62.1-44.9.
Qualifications of members.

Members of the Board shall be citizens of the Commonwealth; shall be selected from the Commonwealth at large for merit without regard to political affiliation; and shall, by character and reputation, reasonably be expected to inspire the highest degree of cooperation and confidence in the work of the Board. Members shall, by their education, training, or experience, be knowledgeable of water quality control and regulation and shall be fairly representative of conservation, public health, business, land development, and agriculture. In making appointments, the Governor shall endeavor to ensure balanced geographical representation. No person shall become a member of the Board who receives, or during the previous two years has received, a significant portion of his income directly or indirectly from certificate or permit holders or applicants for a certificate or permit.For the purposes of this section, “significant portion of income” means 10 percent or more of gross personal income for a calendar year, except that it means 50 percent or more of gross personal income for a calendar year if the recipient is over 60 years of age and is receiving that portion under retirement, pension, or similar arrangement. Income includes retirement benefits, consultant fees, and stock dividends. Income is not received directly or indirectly from certificate or permit holders or applicants for certificates or permits when it is derived from mutual fund payments, or from other diversified investments for which the recipient does not know the identity of the primary sources of income.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section relating to Board membership, the qualifications for Board membership shall not be more strict than those that are required by federal statute or regulations of the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-21; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1994, c. 461; 2008, cc. 276, 557; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2014, c. 150.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, cc. 276 and 557, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act do not apply to any permit action public noticed prior to July 1, 2008.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 276 and 557 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted the second sentence; substituted “that are” for “which may be” in subsection B; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and inserted “land development,” near the end of the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 150, amended subsection A by adding the second to last sentence.

§ 62.1-44.10.
Repealed by Acts 1980, c. 728.

§ 62.1-44.11.
Meetings.

The Board shall meet at least four times a year, and other meetings may be held at any time or place determined by the Board or upon call of the chairman or upon written request of any two members. All members shall be duly notified of the time and place of any regular or other meeting at least five days in advance of such meeting.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-23; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

§ 62.1-44.12.
Records of proceedings; special orders, standards, policies, rules and regulations.

The Board shall keep a complete and accurate record of the proceedings at all its meetings, a copy of which shall be kept on file in the office of the Executive Director and open to public inspection. Any standards, policies, rules or regulations adopted by the Board to have general effect in part or all of the Commonwealth shall be filed in accordance with the Virginia Register Act (§

2.2-4100

et seq.). The owner to whom any special order is issued under the provisions of §

62.1-44.15

shall be notified by certified mail sent to the last known address of such owner and the time limits specified shall be counted from the date of mailing.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-24; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1977, c. 32; 1981, c. 620.

§ 62.1-44.13.
Inspections and investigations, etc.

The Board shall make such inspections, conduct such investigations and do such other things as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, within the limits of appropriation, funds, or personnel which are, or become, available from any source for this purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-25; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638.

§ 62.1-44.14.
Chairman; Executive Director; employment of personnel; supervision; budget preparation.

The Board shall elect its chairman, and the Executive Director shall be appointed as set forth in §

2.2-106

. The Executive Director shall serve as executive officer and devote his whole time to the performance of his duties, and he shall have such administrative powers as are conferred upon him by the Board; and, further, the Board may delegate to its Executive Director any of the powers and duties invested in it by this chapter except the adoption and promulgation of standards, rules and regulations; and the revocation of certificates. The Executive Director is authorized to issue, modify or revoke orders in cases of emergency as described in §§

62.1-44.15

(8b) and

62.1-44.34:20

of this chapter. The Executive Director is further authorized to employ such consultants and full-time technical and clerical workers as are necessary and within the available funds to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

It shall be the duty of the Executive Director to exercise general supervision and control over the quality and management of all state waters and to administer and enforce this chapter, and all certificates, standards, policies, rules, regulations, rulings and special orders promulgated by the Board. The Executive Director shall prepare, approve, and submit all requests for appropriations and be responsible for all expenditures pursuant to appropriations. The Executive Director shall be vested with all the authority of the Board when it is not in session, except for the Board’s authority to issue special orders pursuant to subdivisions (8a) and (8b) of §

62.1-44.15

and subject to such regulations as may be prescribed by the Board. In no event shall the Executive Director have the authority to adopt or promulgate any regulation.

History.

Code 1950, § 62.1-26; 1968, c. 659; 1970, c. 638; 1981, c. 620; 1984, c. 444; 1985, c. 397; 1992, c. 456; 2005, c. 706; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2022, c. 356.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 706, cl. 2 provides: “That the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop uniform procedures to govern the formal hearings conducted pursuant to this act to ensure they are conducted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act, any policies adopted by the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board, or the State Air Pollution Control Board and to ensure that the facility owners and operators have access to information on how such hearings will be conducted. In addition, the Director of the Department of Environmental Quality shall develop and implement an early dispute resolution process to help identify and resolve disagreements regarding what is required to comply with the regulations promulgated by the State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, the Virginia Waste Management Board and any related guidance. The process shall be available after the issuance of a notice of alleged violation or other notice of deficiency issued by the Department. The early dispute resolution process shall be developed by September 1, 2005, and information on the process shall be provided to the public and to facilities potentially impacted by the provisions of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 706, in the first paragraph, inserted “and” preceding “the revocation of certificates,” deleted “and the issuance, modification, or revocation of orders” at the end of the second sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the second paragraph.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 356 deleted “to consider permits pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:02

” following “the Board’s authority” in the second paragraph in the penultimate sentence.